Texas statutes.
WATER CODE

TITLE 4. GENERAL LAW DISTRICTS

CHAPTER 52. UNDERGROUND WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 52.005. APPLICABILITY TO UNDERGROUND WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICTS GENERALLY. (a) , (b) Repealed by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 933, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

(c) Sections 49.052, 49.216, and 49.301 through 49.308 do not apply to districts governed by this chapter.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 701, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch.715, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.